Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB276.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Pregnant Workers Fairness Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Commission." The Pennsylvania Human Relations Commission."Covered entity." The Commonwealth, a political subdivision or board, department or commission of the Commonwealth, a school district and a person employing one or more persons within this 12345678910111213141516171819 Commonwealth."Person." One or more individuals, partnerships, associations, organizations, corporations, legal representatives, trustees in bankruptcy or receivers. The term includes any owner, lessor, assignor, builder, manager, broker, salesman, agent, employee, independent contractor and lending institution and the Commonwealth and all political subdivisions, authorities, boards and commissions thereof."Reasonable accommodation." A modification to the work environment to enable an employee to continue working despite limitations due to pregnancy, childbirth or related medical conditions that do not present an undue hardship on the employer. A reasonable accommodation may include:(1) Providing a chair, assistance with heavy lifting, access to drinking water or uncompensated break time.(2) Temporary job restructuring, part-time or modified work schedules, reassignment to a vacant position, acquisition or modification of equipment or devices, appropriate adjustment or modifications of examinations and other similar accommodations.Section 3. Reasonable accommodations related to pregnancy, childbirth or related medical conditions.(a) Unlawful practice.--It shall be an unlawful employment practice for a covered entity to:(1) Refuse an employee's or prospective employee's request for reasonable accommodations for limitations related to pregnancy, childbirth or related medical conditions, unless the covered entity can demonstrate that the accommodation would impose an undue hardship on the covered entity's operations.20250SB0276PN0229 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Deny employment opportunities to an employee or prospective employee if the denial is based on the employee's or prospective employee's need for an accommodation related to pregnancy, childbirth or related medical conditions.(3) Require an employee or prospective employee to accept an accommodation that changes the terms, privileges or conditions of the employee or prospective employee's employment, including reductions in pay or hours or changes in shifts or location, unless requested or agreed to by the employee or prospective employee.(4) Require an employee to take leave under any policy of the covered entity or law if other reasonable accommodations can be provided to address the employee's limitations related to pregnancy, childbirth or related medical conditions that would enable the employee to continue working.(b) Undue hardship.--The covered entity shall have the burden of proving undue hardship under subsection (a)(1). The factors to be considered in determining whether a requested accommodation presents an undue hardship to the covered entity include:(1) The overall size and nature of the covered entity, its structure, the composition of its workforce and the number and type of facilities.(2) The extent, nature and cost of the requested reasonable accommodation.(c) Nondiscrimination.--A person may not discriminate or retaliate against an individual because the individual has opposed any act or practice made unlawful by this act or because the individual made a charge, testified, assisted or 20250SB0276PN0229 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 participated in any manner in an investigation, proceeding or hearing under this act.Section 4. Remedies and enforcement.A person claiming discrimination in violation of section 3 may take either of the following actions:(1) If otherwise permitted by the laws or rules of this Commonwealth, bring an action for preliminary injunctive relief in an appropriate court. Any order or relief shall be granted in accordance with Pa.R.C.P. No. 1531 (relating to Special Relief. Injunctions.).(2) Make, sign and file with the commission a verified complaint in writing pursuant to the procedures specified in the act of October 27, 1955 (P.L.744, No.222), known as the Pennsylvania Human Relations Act, with all appeals, enforcement mechanisms, judicial review and remedies, including damages and attorney fees, available under that act.Section 5. Notice.The commission shall develop and publish a written notice regarding employees' rights under this act. Employers shall display the notice in plain view in the workplace.Section 6. Rulemaking.Not later than two years after the effective date of this section, the commission shall issue regulations in an accessible format to effectuate the policies and provisions of this act.Section 7. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0276PN0229 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627